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DI3P2-02

DTC P0135/21 | Oxygen Sensor Heater Circuit
Malfunction (Bank 1 Sensor 1)

DTC P0141/21 | Oxygen Sensor Heater Circuit
Malfunction (Bank 1 Sensor 2)

DTC P0155/28 | Oxygen Sensor Heater Circuit
Malfunction (Bank 2 Sensor 1)

DTC P0161/28 | Oxygen Sensor Heater Circuit
Malfunction (Bank 2 Sensor 2)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
Refer to DTC P0125/91 on page DI-30.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
P0135/21 ) o
. . *Open or short in heater circuit of oxygen sensor
P0141/21 Open or short in heater circuit of oxygen sensor 0.5 sec. or
«Oxygen sensor heater
P0155/28 more ;
*Engine ECU
P0161/28
HINT:

. Bank 1 refers to bank that includes cylinder No.1.

. Bank 2 refers to bank that does not include cylinder No.1.

e  Sensor 1 refers to the sensor closer to the engine body.

e  Sensor 2 refers to the sensor farther away from the engine body.

WIRING DIAGRAM
Refer to DTC P0125/91 on page DI-30.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:

Readfreezeframedatausinghand -heldtester. Becausefreeze framerecordsthe engine conditions when
the malfunction is detected, when troubleshooting it is useful for determining whether the vehicle was run-

ning or stopped, the engine warmed up or not, the air -
fuelratiolean orrich, etc. atthe time of the malfunction.
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1 Check voltage between terminals HTR, HTR2, HTL, HTL2 of engine ECU
connector and body ground.

Excpt Europe, Turkey: PREPARATION:
ON (@ Remove the glove compartment door.
HTL HTR HTL2 HTR2 (b) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:

faiess Measure voltage between terminals HTR, HTR2, HTL, HTL2 of
N the engine ECU connector and body ground.

HINT:

. Connect terminal HTR to bank 2 sensor 1.

. Connect terminal HTR2 to bank 2 sensor 2.

. Connect terminal HTL to bank 1 sensor 1.

Connect terminal HTL2 to bank 1 sensor 2.

1,

OK:

Voltage: 9 - 14V

(See page IN-19).

0K> Check and replace engine ECU

Y A16784

2 [ Check resistance of oxygen sensor heater (See Pub. No. RM630E on page FI-71).

Check and repair harness or connector be-
tween main relay and oxygen sensor and en-
gine ECU (See page IN-19).

NG> Replace oxygen sensor.
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